Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-146
Purchases; Department of Administrative Services; requisition.

All purchases shall be made through the Department of Administrative Services upon the requisition of the proper authority of the department, institution or agency of the state, or of the county or other governmental subdivision requiring such articles.

Laws 1935, c. 183, § 3, p. 679;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-958;

R.S.1943, § 83-146;

Laws 1967, c. 603, § 1, p. 2045.